Washington statutes.
RCW 17.21.280

Disposition of revenue, enforcement of chapter—Pesticide safety education program—Fee—District court fees, fines, penalties, and forfeitures.

(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (4) of this section, all moneys collected under the provisions of this chapter shall be paid to the director and deposited in the agricultural local fund, RCW 43.23.230, for use exclusively in the enforcement of this chapter.

(2) In addition to any other fees the department may collect under this chapter, the department shall collect a fee of seven dollars for each license issued by the department under this chapter. The department shall transmit the seven dollar fee required by this subsection to Washington State University for the purpose of providing a pesticide safety education program to educate and train pesticide licensees and prospective licensees.

(3) The department shall engage with the regulated community on the status of license fees established in this chapter, including consideration of future increases, in coordination with a stakeholder work group.

(4) All moneys collected for civil penalties levied under RCW 17.21.315 shall be deposited in the state general fund. All fees, fines, forfeitures and penalties collected or assessed by a district court because of the violation of a state law shall be remitted as provided in chapter 3.62 RCW.

[ 2021 c 244 s 14; 1997 c 242 s 18; 1994 c 283 s 29; 1989 c 380 s 59; 1987 c 202 s 183; 1969 ex.s. c 199 s 15; 1961 c 249 s 28.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2021 c 244: See note following RCW 15.58.070.

Intent—1987 c 202: See note following RCW 2.04.190.